New York, session 2025-2026, S6555.
do enact as follows:
1 Section 1. The retirement and social security law is amended by adding
2 a new section 607-m to read as follows:
3 § 607-m. Disabilities of fire alarm dispatchers in certain cases. 1.
4 Notwithstanding the provisions of any general, special or local law or
5 administrative code to the contrary, but except for the purposes of the
6 workers' compensation law and the labor law, any condition of impairment
7 of health caused by diseases of the heart, resulting in total or partial
8 disability or death to a person performing the duties of a fire alarm
9 dispatcher, a supervising fire alarm dispatcher level one or a supervis-
10 ing fire alarm dispatcher level two of a fire department in a city with
11 a population of one million or more, who successfully passed a physical
12 examination on entry into such service or subsequent thereto, which
13 examination failed to reveal any evidence of such condition, shall be
14 presumptive evidence that it was incurred in the performance and
15 discharge of duty, unless the contrary be proved by competent evidence.
16 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a fire alarm dispatch-
17 er, supervising fire alarm dispatcher level one or supervising fire
18 alarm dispatcher level two member of a fire department in a city with a
19 population of one million or more retiring pursuant to the provisions of
EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets
[ ] is old law to be omitted.
LBD07109-03-6

S. 6555--A 2
1 subdivision one of this section shall receive a pension equal to three-
2 fourths of such member's final average salary.
3 § 2. All past service costs associated with implementing the
4 provisions of this act shall be borne by the city of New York.
5 § 3. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, none of the
6 provisions of this act shall be subject to the appropriation requirement
7 of section 25 of the retirement and social security law.
8 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately.
FISCAL NOTE.--Pursuant to Legislative Law, Section 50:
SUMMARY: This proposed legislation would provide to NYCERS Tier 4 and
Tier 6 Fire Alarm Dispatchers a rebuttable statutory presumption that a
qualifying disability or death related to heart disease was incurred in
the performance of duty and provide a performance of duty disability
benefit equal to 75% of the member's Final Average Salary.
ILLUSTRATION - INCREASE (DECREASE) IN EMPLOYER CONTRIBUTIONS
by Fiscal Year for the first 25 years ($ in Thousands)
One Incident One Incident Per Year
Year Disability Death Disability Death
2027 59 42 59 42
2028 59 42 119 85
2029 59 42 181 129
2030 59 42 245 175
2031 59 42 311 222
2032 59 42 379 271
2033 59 42 449 321
2034 59 42 521 372
2035 59 42 596 425
2036 59 42 672 480
2037 59 42 751 536
2038 59 42 832 594
2039 59 42 915 653
2040 59 42 1,002 715
2041 0 0 1,032 736
2042 0 0 1,063 758
2043 0 0 1,094 781
2044 0 0 1,127 804
2045 0 0 1,161 829
2046 0 0 1,196 853
2047 0 0 1,232 879
2048 0 0 1,269 905
2049 0 0 1,307 933
2050 0 0 1,346 961
2051 0 0 1,386 989
Employer contribution impact beyond Fiscal Year 2051 is not shown.
The potential increases in employer contributions will be allocated to
New York City.
PRESENT VALUE OF BENEFITS: The Present Value of Benefits is the
discounted expected value of benefits paid to current members if all
assumptions are met, including future service accrual and pay increases.
Future new hires are not included in this present value.
INITIAL INCREASE (DECREASE) IN ACTUARIAL PRESENT VALUES
as of June 30, 2025 ($ in Thousands)

S. 6555--A 3
Present Value (PV) Per Disability Per Death
(1) PV of Employer Contributions: 496 354
(2) PV of Employee Contributions: (40) 0
Total PV of Benefits (1) + (2): 456 354
UNFUNDED ACCRUED LIABILITY (UAL): Actuarial Accrued Liabilities are
the portion of the Present Value of Benefits allocated to past service.
Changes in UAL per incident would be recognized as ongoing gain/loss.
AMORTIZATION OF UNFUNDED ACCRUED LIABILITY
Recognized as Ongoing Gain/Loss Per Disability Per Death
Increase (Decrease) in UAL: 496 K 354 K
Number of Payments: 14 14
Amortization Payment: 59 K 42 K
CENSUS DATA: The number of members who will benefit in the future from
this proposed legislation is unknown. The estimates presented herein are
based on preliminary census data collected as of June 30, 2025. The
census data for the potentially impacted population used to develop the
average costs is summarized below.
NYCERS
Active Members
- Number Count: 186
- Average Age: 40.6
- Average Service: 12.1
- Average Salary: 89,700
IMPACT ON MEMBER BENEFITS: Currently, active Tier 4 or Tier 6 members
of NYCERS who are employed as Fire Alarm Dispatchers and become disabled
due to heart disease would generally be eligible for an applicable ordi-
nary disability retirement after attaining 10 years of service. The
disability benefit is generally a lifetime payment equal to the greatest
of 1/3 of Final Average Salary (FAS), 1/60th of FAS times service, or
the service retirement benefit, if eligible.
Under the proposed legislation, the performance of duty disability
benefit for Tier 4 or Tier 6 Fire Alarm Dispatcher members who are disa-
bled from heart disease would be equal to 75% of FAS without an offset
for Workers' Compensation.
The ordinary death benefit for NYCERS Fire Alarm Dispatchers is a lump
sum payment generally equal to three times the member's salary, plus a
refund of member contributions. Under the proposed legislation, the
performance of duty death benefit would generally be equal to a lifetime
benefit of 50% of a member's wages earned during their last year of
service, payable to certain beneficiaries.
ASSUMPTIONS AND METHODS: The estimates presented herein have been
calculated based on the Revised 2021 Actuarial Assumptions and Methods
of the impacted retirement systems.
The number of members who will benefit from this proposed legislation
is unknown. The cost of this proposed legislation could vary greatly
depending on the number of future members who benefit and on their
length of service, age, and salary history. In particular, the increase
would be greater for a member who is not yet eligible for an ordinary
disability benefit when disabled.
The estimated financial impact for disabled members has been calcu-
lated assuming 50% would have retired under the current ordinary disa-

S. 6555--A 4
bility benefit, and 50% would have continued working if the proposed
legislation were not passed.
RISK AND UNCERTAINTY: The costs presented in this Fiscal Note depend
highly on the actuarial assumptions, methods, and models used, demo-
graphics of the impacted population, and other factors such as invest-
ment, contribution, and other risks. If actual experience deviates from
actuarial assumptions, the actual costs could differ from those
presented herein. Quantifying these risks is beyond the scope of this
Fiscal Note.
This Fiscal Note is intended to measure pension-related impacts and
does not include other potential costs (e.g., administrative and Other
Postemployment Benefits). This Fiscal Note does not reflect any chapter
laws that may have been enacted during the current legislative session.
STATEMENT OF ACTUARIAL OPINION: Marek Tyszkiewicz and Gregory Zelikov-
sky are members of the Society of Actuaries and the American Academy of
Actuaries. We are members of NYCERS, but do not believe it impairs our
objectivity, and we meet the Qualification Standards of the American
Academy of Actuaries to render the actuarial opinion contained herein.
To the best of our knowledge, the results contained herein have been
prepared in accordance with generally accepted actuarial principles and
procedures and with the Actuarial Standards of Practice issued by the
Actuarial Standards Board.
FISCAL NOTE IDENTIFICATION: This Fiscal Note 2026-41 dated March 13,
2026 was prepared by the Chief Actuary for the New York City Retirement
Systems and Pension Funds and is intended for use only during the 2026
Legislative Session.